Hawaii statutes.
§351-84 Special account, creation,
disbursements. (a) Monetary compensation received by the commission
pursuant to section 351-82(2) shall be deposited into a special account
established by the commission. The moneys deposited into the special account
including interest earned shall be retained or disbursed by the commission
pursuant to this section.

(b) Moneys deposited into the special account
shall be used first as provided in section 351-83, if necessary, and
then to reimburse the crime victim compensation special fund for payments made
pursuant to this chapter for the crime committed by the convicted person.

(c) Moneys remaining after disbursement under
subsection (b) shall be disbursed to a judgment creditor, for the purpose of
satisfying a judgment, from the special account if:

(1) The judgment creditor is a victim, a victim's
representative, or other person specified in section 351-31, or a person
who is not specified in section 351-31 but is the victim of a crime
subject to this part;

(2) The judgment is for the damages arising out of
the criminal act of the convicted person;

(3) A certified copy of the judgment is presented to
the commission; and

(4) There is no order staying the judgment or
enjoining disbursement.

Judgment creditors shall be paid out of the
special account in the order in which certified copies of the judgments are
presented to the commission. [L 1986, c 155, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 141, §30;
am L 1998, c 240, §7; am L 1999, c 18, §11]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next